Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 10

Joint Legislative Services Committee

3-10-101. Creation — Composition.

There is created a joint legislative services committee, hereinafter referred to as the committee, which shall constitute a special committee of the general assembly.

The committee shall be composed of ten (10) members. The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall be members and shall serve as co-chairs of the committee. The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint two (2) members of the majority party and two (2) members of the minority party from the respective houses.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-1001.

3-10-102. Appointment — Terms — Vacancies.

Appointment of members of the committee shall be made at the same time as standing committee appointments are made. Members shall serve until the end of their terms of office or until the next regular November general election, whichever occurs first.

In the event of a vacancy on the committee, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-1002.

3-10-103. Meetings.

The first meeting of the committee shall be held at the call of the co-chairs within fifteen (15) days after the appointment of the members. Thereafter, the committee shall meet at least one (1) time during each regular or adjourned session of the general assembly. Other meetings may be called during or between sessions by the co-chairs at their pleasure or by a majority of the members of the committee. Members of the committee from the senate only or the house of representatives only may meet at the call of the appropriate speaker to consider matters concerning only the senate or the house of representatives, respectively.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-1003.

3-10-104. Recommendations on management, policy and procedure.

The committee shall make recommendations on management, policies, and procedures to be employed in providing services to the general assembly or either house thereof. Recommendations which concern only one (1) house shall be approved by a majority of the committee members from the appropriate house and the speaker of that house. Recommendations which concern the general assembly as a whole shall be approved by a majority of the committee and by both speakers.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 3; T.C.A., § 3-1004.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 43 of the extraordinary session of the 104th general assembly provided:

“(a) The general assembly recognizes that the library and archives division of the office of the secretary of state currently records or causes to be recorded, audio of all House and Senate floor sessions, all House and Senate standing committee meetings, oversight meetings and some subcommittee meetings. The general assembly further recognizes that audio of those subcommittee meetings held in the legislative plaza which are not recorded by the office of the secretary of state are recorded or caused to be recorded by staff of the general assembly and provided to the division of library and archives in the office of the secretary of state. It is the intent of the general assembly that this practice shall continue, and the secretary of state shall expand recording operations to fully record the proceedings of the general assembly and its committees and subcommittees.

“(b) The general assembly recognizes that staff of the general assembly currently post on the official web site of the general assembly the final action votes taken on legislation by standing committees and subcommittees. It is the intent of the general assembly that this practice shall continue.

“(c) The general assembly recognizes that instructions on how to look up final action votes on legislation for the House and Senate, for standing committees and subcommittees are posted on the official general assembly web site. It is the intent of the general assembly that this practice shall continue. It is the further legislative intent that House and Senate final action floor votes on legislation recorded by the electronic voting system shall be posted to the official general assembly web site in journal form or other appropriate form in a timely fashion, taking into consideration cross checks for accuracy that must be completed to ensure accuracy prior to such posting.

“(d) The 104th General Assembly must recognize that the appellate courts of Tennessee, in specifically considering the open meetings law, have unequivocally ruled that Article II, Section 12 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee prevents this or any other general assembly from statutorily binding a future general assembly on rules of proceedings. Therefore, this general assembly must truthfully acknowledge that the provisions of this section can be legally binding only for the duration of the 104th General Assembly. However, each future general assembly is strongly encouraged and vigorously urged to adopt rules incorporating provisions no less stringent than the provisions of this section.”

3-10-105. Cooperation of state departments, institutions and agencies.

The office of legal services, the office of legislative administration, office of legislative budget analysis and the office of legislative information systems established by §§ 3-12-101, 3-13-101, 3-14-201 and 3-16-101, respectively, may call upon the state library, state universities and colleges, the comptroller of the treasury, the state planning office, the attorney general and reporter, and all other state departments and agencies for assistance and advice.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter to render opinions and give counsel to the office of legal services, the office of legislative administration, and the offices of legislative information systems upon request of the directors of the respective offices.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 12; T.C.A., § 3-1005; Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 6; 1999, ch. 497, § 6; 2010, ch. 1077, §§ 4-6.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in (a), was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Cross-References. Duties of attorney general and reporter, §8-6-109.

3-10-106. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-10-106 (Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 13; T.C.A., § 3-1006), concerning records and communications, confidentiality, and location for efficient use, is deemed obsolete. See ch. 16 of this title and §§3-10-105 —3-10-109. See also §10-7-504.

3-10-107. Legislative information systems — Select advisory council — Staff user group.

A select advisory council on legislative information systems may be appointed by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. Such council shall be composed of an equal number of members of the senate and the house of representatives as the speakers shall determine, and the clerks shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the advisory council. The legislative members shall be appointed in the same manner as the members of the joint legislative services committee.

The select advisory council shall advise the speakers and the joint legislative services committee on policies and procedures relative to the electronic data processing system and services provided by the legislative information systems.

There is created a staff user group which shall be composed of ten (10) members. The chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall be members and shall serve as co-chairs of the group. The other members of the staff user group shall be the director of the office of legislative administration, office of legislative budget analysis, the director of the office of legal services, the director of the office of management information services, the executive director of the fiscal review committee, and one (1) secretary from a standing committee of each house to be appointed by the respective speakers. The staff user group may advise the speakers, the joint legislative services committee, and the select advisory council on policies and procedures relative to the electronic data processing system.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 7; 1999, ch. 497, §§ 6, 7; 2010, ch. 1077, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1 repealed provisions concerning the office of legislative services, effective June 21, 2010. In subsection (b), “the director of the office of legislative services,” was deleted following “the office of legal services,” by the code commission in 2010.

Cross-References. Control, operation and maintenance of legislative computer system and equipment, §3-16-103.

Office and director of legislative information systems, §§3-16-101,3-16-102.

3-10-108. Access to legislative computer system — Reproduction of Tennessee Code Annotated.

The joint legislative services committee shall consider each application for direct access to the legislative computer system in which confidential information is stored or processed, or that is connected to another computer in which confidential information is stored or processed, and solely shall determine whether or not to permit direct access by the applicant.

Direct access to such a computer may not be permitted unless protection of any confidential information is ensured.

The provisions of § 10-7-503 shall not apply to records or information otherwise available in printed form or to information or records otherwise exempt from the provisions of § 10-7-503.

If public information is stored in a computer-readable form, the committee has exclusive authority to determine the form in which the information will be reproduced for the requestor of the information; provided, that the reproduction, publication, and sale of Tennessee Code Annotated in any form, in whole or in part, shall be pursuant to the provisions of title 1, chapter 1. If access to such public information is also available in printed form, it need not be provided in an electronic readable form.

The committee shall designate the terminals, if any, at which public access is given to public information. The data processing equipment located in the offices of members of the general assembly and legislative staff need not provide such access if not so designated by the committee.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 8.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Control, operation and maintenance of legislative computer system and equipment, §3-16-103.

3-10-109. Legislative computer access and information — Violations — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to intentionally or knowingly gain access to information stored or maintained in a computer under the control of the joint legislative services committee if it is not lawful for such person to have access and such person is also not authorized by such committee to have access to that information.

It is unlawful for a person to intentionally, knowingly or recklessly damage, destroy, delete, alter, or impair access to or use of information stored or maintained in a computer under the control of the joint legislative services committee if such person is not authorized by such committee to do so.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 9; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Office and director of management information systems, §§3-16-101,3-16-102.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

3-10-110. Actions to increase public access.

The house of representatives shall take action to improve, enhance, and expand its audio-visual, Internet, graphics, captioning, wireless and broadcast capabilities so that public access to its proceedings will increase.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 44.